Hawaii statutes.
§10H-4 Notice of qualified Native Hawaiian
roll. (a) The commission shall publish notice of the certification of the
qualified Native Hawaiian roll, update the roll as necessary, and publish
notice of the updated roll of qualified Native Hawaiians; provided that the
commission shall not publish or release any verification documents of any
qualified Native Hawaiian on the roll.

(b) The publication of the initial and updated
rolls shall serve as the basis for the eligibility of qualified Native Hawaiians
whose names are listed on the rolls to participate in the organization of the
Native Hawaiian governing entity. [L 2011, c 195, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 84, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next